en: Mounting mechanism: 1/4-inch screw; Cold shoe; MagSafe; Magnetic ring; Neck mount; Screw clamp; Spring clamp; Universal clip; Other
es: Mecanismo de montaje: Tornillo de 1/4 de pulgada; Zapata fría; MagSafe; Anillo magnético; Montaje de cuello; Abrazadera de tornillo; Abrazadera de resorte; Clip universal; Otros
pt-BR: Mecanismo de fixação: Parafuso de 1/4 de polegada; Sapata fria; MagSafe; Anel magnético; Montagem no pescoço; Braçadeira de parafuso; Braçadeira de mola; Clipe universal; Outro
sk-SK: Montážny mechanizmus: 1/4-palcová skrutka; Cold shoe; MagSafe; Magnetický krúžok; Držiak na krk; Skrutková svorka; Pružinová svorka; Univerzálna spona; Iné
vi: Cơ chế gắn: Vít 1/4 inch; Ngàm không cần điện; MagSafe; Vòng từ tính; Giá đeo cổ; Kẹp vít; Kẹp lò xo; Kẹp đa năng; Khác
it: Meccanismo di montaggio: vite da 1/4 di pollice; Scarpa fredda; MagSafe; Anello magnetico; Supporto per il collo; Morsetto a vite; Morsetto a molla; Clip universale; Altro
zh-TW: 安裝機制: 1/4 吋螺旋式; 冷靴; MagSafe; 磁性環; 頸掛式; 螺旋夾; 彈簧夾; 通用夾; 其他
sv: Monteringsmekanism: 1/4-tums skruv; Kamerafäste; MagSafe; Magnetisk knäppning; Nackhållare; Skruvklämma; Fjäderklämma; Universell klämma; Övrigt
ja: 取り付けメカニズム: 1/4インチネジ; コールドシュー; MagSafe; 磁気リング; ネックマウント; ネジクランプ; スプリングクランプ; ユニバーサルクリップ; その他
ro-RO: Mecanism de blocare: Șurub de 1/4 inchi; Cold shoe; MagSafe; Inel magnetic; Suport pentru gât; Clemă cu șurub; Clemă cu arc; Universal; Altele
zh-CN: 安装机制: 1/4 英寸螺丝; 冷靴接口; MagSafe; 磁吸环; 颈挂式; 螺丝夹; 弹簧夹; 万能夹; 其他
nl: Montagemechanisme: 1/4-inch schroef; Schoenbevestiging; MagSafe; Magnetische ring; Nekmontage; Schroefklem; Veerklem; Universele clip; Andere
hr-HR: Mehanizam postavljanja: Vijak 1/4 inča; Cold shoe; MagSafe; Magnetni prsten; Montaža na vrat; Vijčana stezaljka; Opružna stezaljka; Univerzalna kopča; Ostalo
el: Μηχανισμός τοποθέτησης: Βίδα 1/4 ίντσας; Cold shoe; MagSafe; Μαγνητικός δακτύλιος; Βάση λαιμού; Σφιγκτήρας βίδας; Σφιγκτήρας ελατηρίου; Κλιπ καθολικής χρήσης; Άλλο
fi: Kiinnitysmekanismi: 1/4 tuuman ruuvi; Salamapidike; MagSafe; Magneettinen rengas; Kaulakiinnike; Ruuvipuristin; Jousipuristin; Yleisklipsi; Muu
sl-SI: Mehanizem pritrditve: 1/4-palčni vijak; Hladni nastavek; MagSafe; Magnetni obroč; Nosilec za vrat; Vijačna spona; Vzmetna objemka; Univerzalno; Drugo
ko: 장착 메커니즘: 1/4인치 나사; 콜드슈; MagSafe; 자석 링; 넥 마운트; 나사 클램프; 스프링 클램프; 범용 클립; 기타
pt-PT: Mecanismo de montagem: Parafuso de 1/4 de polegada; Montagem de sapata; MagSafe; Anel magnético; Suporte de pescoço; Abraçadeira com parafuso; Braçadeira de mola; Clipe universal; Outro
fr: Mécanisme de montage: vis 1/4 pouce; Chaussure froide; MagSafe; Anneau magnétique; Montage sur cou; Serre-joint à vis; Pince à ressort; Clip universel; Autre
hu: Rögzítőmechanizmus: 1/4 colos csavar; Vakupapucs; MagSafe; Mágneses gyűrű; Nyakpánt; Csavaros bilincs; Rugós szorító; Univerzális csíptető; Egyéb
tr: Montaj mekanizması: 1/4 inç vida; Soğuk yuva; MagSafe; Manyetik halka; Boyun montajı; Vidalı kelepçe; Yaylı kelepçe; Evrensel klips; Diğer
cs: Mechanismus uchycení: 1/4palcový šroub; Sáňky; MagSafe; Magnetický kroužek; Držák na krk; Šroubová svorka; Pružinová svorka; Univerzální klip; Jiné
da: Monteringsmekanisme: 1/4-tommer skrue; Cold shoe; MagSafe; Magnetisk ring; Halsmontering; Skrueklemme; Fjederklemme; Universalklips; Andet
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo mechanizmas: 1/4 colio varžtas; Fiksuotas laikiklis; „MagSafe“; Magnetinis žiedas; Tvirtinamas prie kaklo; Sraigtinis spaustukas; Spyruoklinis; Universalus spaustukas; Kita
ru: Механизм установки: Винт 1/4 дюйма; Холодный башмак; MagSafe; Магнитное кольцо; Крепление на шею; Винтовой зажим; Пружинный зажим; Универсальный зажим; Другой
pl: Mechanizm mocowania: Śruba 1/4 cala; Zimna stopka; MagSafe; Pierścień magnetyczny; Uchwyt na szyję; Zacisk śrubowy; Docisk sprężynowy; Uniwersalny klips; Inne
bg-BG: Механизъм за монтаж: 1/4-инчов винт; Cold shoe; MagSafe; Магнитен пръстен; Монтаж на врата; Винтова скоба; Пружинна скоба; Универсална щипка; Други
de: Montagemechanismus: 1/4-Zoll-Schraube; Blitzschuh; MagSafe; Magnetring; Nackenhalterung; Schraubzwinge; Federklemme; Universalclip; Sonstiges
th: กลไกการติดตั้ง: สกรู 1/4 นิ้ว; รองเท้าเย็น; MagSafe; แหวนแม่เหล็ก; การติดตั้งคอ; แคลมป์สกรู; แคลมป์สปริง; คลิปสากล; อื่นๆ
nb: Monteringsmekanisme: Skrue, ¼"; Cold shoe-feste; MagSafe; Magnetisk ring; Halsfeste; Skrueklem; Springklemme; Universalklips; Annet